Virginia statutes. Title 1. General Provisions.
Article 2. Emblems, Designations, and Honors.

§ 1-510.
Official emblems and designations.

The following are hereby designated official emblems and designations of the Commonwealth:

Artisan Center — “Virginia Artisans Center,” located in the City of Waynesboro.

Bat — Virginia Big-eared bat (Corynorhinos townsendii virginianus).

Beverage — Milk.

Bird — Northern Cardinal (Cardinalis cardinalis).

Blue Ridge Folklore State Center — Blue Ridge Institute located in the village of Ferrum.

Boat — “Chesapeake Bay Deadrise.”

Cabin Capital of Virginia — Page County.

Coal Miners’ Memorial — The Richlands Coal Miners’ Memorial located in Tazewell County.

Covered Bridge Capital of the Commonwealth — Patrick County.

Covered Bridge Festival — Virginia Covered Bridge Festival held in Patrick County.

Dog — American Foxhound.

Fish (Freshwater) — Brook Trout.

Fish (Saltwater) — Striped Bass.

Flag of Remembrance of September 11, 2001 — Freedom Flag, designed by a Virginian, as the flag of remembrance of September 11, 2001.

Fleet — Replicas of the three ships, Susan Constant, Godspeed, and Discovery, which comprised the Commonwealth’s founding fleet that brought the first permanent English settlers to Jamestown in 1607, and which are exhibited at the Jamestown Settlement in Williamsburg.

Flower — American Dogwood (Cornus florida).

Folk dance — Square dancing, the American folk dance that traces its ancestry to the English Country Dance and the French Ballroom Dance, and is called, cued, or prompted to the dancers, and includes squares, rounds, clogging, contra, line, the Virginia Reel, and heritage dances.

Fossil — Chesapecten jeffersonius.

Gold mining interpretive center — Monroe Park, located in the County of Fauquier.

Insect — Tiger Swallowtail Butterfly (Papilio glaucus Linne).

Maple Festival — The Highland County Maple Festival.

Motor sports museum — “Wood Brothers Racing Museum and Virginia Motor Sports Hall of Fame,” located in Patrick County.

Opry — The Virginia Opry.

Outdoor drama — “The Trail of the Lonesome Pine Outdoor Drama,” adapted for the stage by Clara Lou Kelly and performed in the Town of Big Stone Gap.

Outdoor drama, historical — “The Long Way Home” based on the life of Mary Draper Ingles, adapted for the stage by Earl Hobson Smith, and performed in the City of Radford.

Rock — Nelsonite.

Salamander — Red Salamander (Pseudotriton ruber).

Shakespeare festival — The Virginia Shakespeare Festival held in the City of Williamsburg.

Shell — Oyster shell (Crassostrea virginica).

Snake — Eastern Garter Snake (Thamnophis sirtalis sirtalis).

Song emeritus — “Carry Me Back to Old Virginny,” by James A. Bland, as set out in the House Joint Resolution 10, adopted by the General Assembly of Virginia at the Session of 1940.

Song (Popular) — “Sweet Virginia Breeze,” by Robbin Thompson and Steve Bassett.

Song (Traditional) — “Our Great Virginia,” lyrics by Mike Greenly and arranged by Jim Papoulis with music from the original American folk song “Oh Shenandoah.”

Spirit — George Washington’s rye whiskey produced at Mount Vernon, Virginia.

Sports hall of fame — “Virginia Sports Hall of Fame,” located in the City of Portsmouth.

Television series — “Song of the Mountains.”

Tree — American Dogwood (Cornus florida).

War memorial museum — “Virginia War Museum,” (formerly known as the War Memorial Museum of Virginia), located in the City of Newport News.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 7-35, 7-36, 7-37; 1966, cc. 102, 547, §§ 7.1-37, 7.1-38, 7.1-39; 1974, c. 24, § 7.1-40; 1982, c. 191, § 7.1-40.1; 1986, c. 138, § 7.1-40.2; 1988, c. 317, § 7.1-40.3; 1991, cc. 71, 575, §§ 7.1-40.4, 7.1-40.5; 1993, cc. 251, 509, § 7.1-40.6; 1994, cc. 33, 134, 220, 464, §§ 7.1-40.2:1, 7.1-40.8; 1995, cc. 12, 180, § 7.1-40.2:2; 1996, c. 52, § 7.1-40.9; 1997, cc. 66, 576, § 7.1-40.10; 1999, cc. 69, 336, § 7.1-40.11; 2001, cc. 97, 134, § 7.1-40.12; 2001, c. 228, § 7.1-40.13; 2005, cc. 557, 839; 2006, c. 128; 2007, cc. 391, 685; 2008, c. 262; 2009, cc. 145, 227; 2011, c. 671; 2013, c. 702; 2014, c. 553; 2015, cc. 586, 587; 2016, cc. 278, 675; 2017, cc. 15, 576, 577; 2018, cc. 284, 684; 2020, c. 583.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 557, enacted former § 7.1-40.7:1 designating the Virginia big-eared bat as the official bat of the Commonwealth.
The substance of the provisions were included in §

1-510

as enacted by Acts 2005, c. 839.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 128 substituted “Corynorhinus” for “Corynorhinos” in the paragraph of Bat; and inserted the paragraph “Fish — Brook Trout.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 391 and 685 are identical, and inserted “Covered Bridge Festival — Virginia Covered Bridge Festival held in Patrick County.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 262 inserted “Covered Bridge Festival — Virginia Covered Bridge Festival held in Patrick County.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 145 inserted “Coal Miners’ Memorial — The Richlands Coal Miners’ Memorial located in Tazewell County.”

The 2009 amendment by c. 227 inserted “Cabin Capital of Virginia — Page County.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 671 inserted “(Freshwater)” following “Fish” and added “Fish (Saltwater) — Striped Bass.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 702 inserted “Shakespeare festival — The Virginia Shakespeare Festival held in the City of Williamsburg.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 553 added the designation of “Maple Festival.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 586 and 587 are identical, and substituted “Virginny” for “Virginia” following “Old” in the designation for “Song emeritus”; and added the designations for “Song (Popular)” and “Song (Traditional).”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 278 inserted “Bird — Northern Cardinal (Cardinalis cardinalis),” “Snake — Eastern Garter Snake (Thamnophis sirtalis sirtalis),” and “Tree — American Dogwood (Cornus florida).”

The 2016 amendment by c. 675, added “Bird — Northern Cardinal (Cardinalis cardinalis),”deleted
“Emergency medical services museum — ‘To The Rescue,’ located in the City of Roanoke,” and added “Rock — Nelsonite”and “Tree — American Dogwood (Cornus florida).”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 15 and 577 are identical, and inserted “Television series — ‘Song of the Mountains.”’

The 2017 amendment by c. 576 inserted “Spirit — George Washington’s rye whiskey produced at Mount Vernon, Virginia.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 284 inserted “Salamander — Red Salamander (Pseudotriton ruber).”

The 2018 amendment by c. 684 inserted the entry for “Flag of Remembrance of September 11, 2001.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 583 added “Opry — The Virginia Opry” to the list of the official emblems and designations of the Commonwealth.

§ 1-511.
English designated the official language of the Commonwealth.

English shall be designated as the official language of the Commonwealth. Except as provided by law, no state agency or local government shall be required to provide and no state agency or local government shall be prohibited from providing any documents, information, literature or other written materials in any language other than English.

History.

1996, c. 829, § 7.1-42; 2005, c. 839.

Law Review.

For comment, “The Fiber of the Common Bond,” see 13 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 367 (2005).

§ 1-512.
Poet laureate.

The honorary position of Poet Laureate of Virginia is hereby created. The Governor may appoint a poet laureate from a list of nominees submitted by the Poetry Society of Virginia. Each poet laureate shall serve a term of two years with no restrictions on reappointment.

History.

1997, c. 299, § 7.1-43; 2005, c. 839.